Vermont statutes. Title 21 Labor
Chapter 16. Displaced Homemakers

§ 1231.
Definition.

“Displaced homemaker” means a person who:

has worked in the home for a substantial number of years providing unpaid household services for family members; and

has or is expected to have difficulty becoming gainfully employed outside the home, or is not gainfully employed or is under-employed; and

has been dependent on the income of another family member and is no longer receiving that income; or has been dependent on government assistance and is no longer eligible for that assistance; or is receiving payments from a spouse or public agency for the care of minor children and the minor children are within two years of reaching majority.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 44

, § 1.

§ 1232.
Displaced homemaker programs and services.

Programs to serve the needs of displaced homemakers may be developed in coordination with the Displaced Homemakers Policy Council and implemented by the Commissioner. The programs may provide the following services:

statewide outreach and advertising to inform displaced homemakers of services and programs available;

job counseling and job placement;

crisis intervention;

peer counseling;

life skills counseling;

resource information and referrals to other State, federal, or private nonprofit programs which provide pre-vocational and vocational training, educational financial support, and other appropriate services; and

any other service which helps displaced homemakers.

The Commissioner, subject to the approval of the Joint Fiscal Committee, may accept federal grants or funds to assist the Department in providing displaced homemaker services and programs.
(b) (1) The Commissioner, subject to the approval of the Joint Fiscal Committee, may accept federal grants or funds to assist the Department in providing displaced homemaker services and programs.

Upon receipt of such funds, the Commissioner shall make those funds available to carry out the goals of the Federal Displaced Homemakers Self Sufficiency Assistance Act, Public Law 101-554, which may include providing funds to existing or new services and programs for displaced homemakers including those mentioned in subsection (c) of this section.

The Commissioner shall coordinate with existing services and other related State and federal organizations to ensure communication and cooperation among programs and to share efforts and resources for new services and programs for displaced homemakers, including the Secretary of Education, the Department for Children and Families, VISTA, the Vermont State Colleges, the University of Vermont, the Vermont Extension Service, and the Governor’s Commission on Women.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 44

, § 1; amended

1995, No. 188

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

1999, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2005, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 53;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 267, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 1233.
Repealed. 1995, No. 188 (Adj. Sess.), § 4.